Arkansas, session 2025, HB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 20-15-602 - 20-15-605 are amended to read
as follows:
20-15-602. State Kidney Disease Commission Advisory Council — Creation
— Members.
(a)(1) There is established a State Kidney Disease Commission Advisory
Council to consist of ten (10) seven (7) members.
(2) Nine (9) Seven (7) members shall be appointed by the
Governor and confirmed by the Senate State Board of Health as follows:
(A) Three (3) members who are knowledgeable in renal
medicine and the treatment of end-stage renal disease shall be physicians
licensed to practice in Arkansas who are actively engaged in the private
practice of medicine in this state;
(B) One (1) member who is knowledgeable in renal medicine
and the treatment of end-stage renal disease shall be a physician licensed in
Arkansas who is engaged primarily in the institutional practice of medicine;
(C) Two (2) members One (1) member shall be persons
*JMB300*
02/11/2025 10:07:41 AM JMB300

HB1456
engaged in hospital administrative activities;
(D) Two (2) members One (1) member shall be named from the
public at large, but they he or she shall be individuals who have an
individual who has a demonstrated interest in the treatment and cure of renal
diseases and may be a representative from an Arkansas-based nonprofit
organization dedicated to the treatment and cure of renal diseases; and
(E) One (1) member who shall represent the elderly shall
be sixty (60) years of age or older and shall be appointed from the state at
large. The member shall not be actively engaged in or retired from any
profession, occupation, or industry which is regulated pursuant to this
subchapter.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Health, or his or her
designee, shall be a member of the commission and shall serve as secretary of
the commission and disbursing officer of funds appropriated to the commission
for the treatment and cure of renal diseases.
(b) Members shall be appointed for four-year terms to expire on
January 14 of the members' fourth year of the appointed term. Members shall
serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.
(c) If a vacancy occurs on the commission advisory council due to
death, resignation, or other cause, the vacancy shall be filled by
appointment of the Governor State Board of Health of a person eligible for
the initial appointment, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, for
the remainder of the unexpired portion of the term of the member.
(d) The commission advisory council shall annually elect one (1) of
its members as chair and one (1) of its members as vice chair and such other
officers as the commission advisory council deems necessary.
(e) The commission shall advisory council may meet as necessary, as
determined by the chair of the advisory council, and shall meet at least one
(1) time each calendar quarter year and at such other times as may be
designated by the commission's advisory council's rules or upon call by the
Chair of the State Kidney Disease Commission Advisory Council or upon written
request of any four (4) three (3) members.
(f) Members shall serve without pay but may receive expense
reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(g) Members shall qualify by taking the oath of office as prescribed
by law.
02/11/2025 10:07:41 AM JMB300

HB1456
(h) A quorum shall consist of a simple majority of the current
appointed members of the advisory council.

20-15-603. State Kidney Disease Commission Department of Health —
Powers and duties.
(a) The State Kidney Disease Commission Department of Health, in
consultation with the State Kidney Disease Advisory Council, shall have the
following functions, powers, and duties:
(1)(A)(i) To establish Administer a program to assist persons
suffering from acute or chronic renal failure in obtaining care and treatment
requiring kidney dialysis or transplantation.
(ii) Services to assist persons requiring
transplantation may include dental services necessary for consideration for
transplantation and the copayment of immunosuppressant drugs post
transplantation.
(B) The program shall provide financial assistance for
persons suffering from chronic renal diseases who require life-saving care
and treatment for the renal disease to the extent as determined by the
commission Department of Health that a person is unable to pay for the
services on a continuing basis without causing unjust and unusual hardship to
himself or herself and his or her immediate family including without
limitation a drastic lowering of the standard of living;
(2) To develop standards Develop rules for determining
eligibility for assistance in defraying the cost of care and treatment of
renal disease under this program, to be recommended for adoption by the State
Board of Health;
(3) To cooperate Cooperate with hospitals, private groups, and
organizations and public agencies in the development of positive programs to
bring about financial assistance and support of evaluation and treatment of
patients suffering from chronic kidney disease;
(4) To cooperate Cooperate with the national and state kidney
foundations and with medical programs of the state and the United States
Government for the purpose of obtaining the maximum amount of federal and
private assistance possible in support of a kidney disease treatment program;
(5) To establish criteria and standards Establish rules for
evaluating the financial ability of persons suffering from chronic kidney
02/11/2025 10:07:41 AM JMB300

HB1456
disease to pay for their own care, including the availability of third-party
insurance coverage, for the purpose of establishing standards rules for
eligibility for financial assistance in defraying the cost of the care and
treatment from funds appropriated to the commission advisory council for
renal disease treatment purposes;
(6) To accept Accept gifts, grants, and donations from private
sources and the United States Government and support from municipal and
county governments to be used for the purposes of this subchapter in
defraying costs incurred by persons suffering from acute or chronic renal
disease who are unable to meet the total cost of life-saving care and
treatment for renal disease; and
(7) To accept Accept gifts, grants, and donations from private
sources and the United States Government and support from municipal and
county governments to be used to honor persons who have provided living
kidney donations to Arkansans in need of kidney transplantation.
(b) Whereas the current Department of Finance and Administration
accounting system will accept current-year refunds, credit the current-year
appropriation, and allow expenditure of the funds, the commission advisory
council, administered by the Department of Health, may accept prior-year
refunds and contributions and deposit the funds into the agency cash fund in
an account specifically identified as the State Kidney Disease Escrow Account
and disbursed for the purchase of additional services for clients served by
the commission advisory council.

20-15-604. State Kidney Disease Commission — Advisory association.
(a) In developing rules and in determining standards for determining
eligibility for financial assistance to persons suffering from chronic renal
diseases who require lifesaving care and treatment for such renal diseases,
the State Kidney Disease Commission shall consult with and obtain the advice
of the Arkansas Association for Kidney Diseases, a nonprofit corporation
organized under the laws of this state. This organization is recognized as
the representative body to serve as an advisory association to the commission
and to the deputy director of the appropriate division as determined by the
Secretary of the Department of Health in carrying out their functions and
duties under this subchapter.
(b) Before promulgating rules and eligibility standards, the
02/11/2025 10:07:41 AM JMB300

HB1456
commission shall consult with the advisory association and shall give
consideration to its recommendations in performing its duties under the
provisions of this subchapter.

20-15-605. State Kidney Disease Commission — Disbursement of funds.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall be the
disbursing officer of funds appropriated by the General Assembly and of other
funds made available to the State Kidney Disease Commission Department of
Health for such purposes.
(2) These funds are to provide monetary assistance to defray the
cost incurred by patients suffering from acute or chronic renal disease who
are unable to meet the total cost of their care or treatment from their own
resources or from third-party resources.
(b) The secretary shall be governed by the policies, rules, and
procedures adopted by the State Board of Health and promulgated by the
commission department under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., in disbursing funds appropriated, or otherwise made
available, to the commission advisory council for renal disease treatment
purposes.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Membership of the
State Kidney Disease Commission — Transition to the State Kidney Disease
Advisory Council.
(a) The terms of the members of the State Kidney Disease Commission
shall expire on the effective date of this act.
(b) The State Board of Health shall appoint new members to the State
Kidney Disease Advisory Council on and after the effective date of this act.
(c) Members of the commission may submit applications to the board for
appointment to the advisory council.







02/11/2025 10:07:41 AM JMB300